Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Solid Wastes Disposal

§ 17-17-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 24, 1974).

§ 17-17-2.
Administration and enforcement transferred to Commission on Environmental Quality and Department of Environmental Quality.

The administration and enforcement of the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974 are hereby transferred from the State Board of Health to the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality and the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality. All personnel, records, property, equipment and funds allocated to the State Board of Health exclusively for the administration and enforcement of the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974, as amended, are hereby transferred to and placed under the supervision and control of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 494 § 22, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1991).

§ 17-17-3.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the following words shall have the definitions ascribed herein unless the context requires otherwise:

“Agency” means any controlling agency, public or private, elected, appointed or volunteer, controlling and supervising the collection and/or disposal of solid wastes.

“Ashes” means the solid residue from burning of wood, coal, coke or other combustible materials used for heating, or from incineration of solid wastes, but excepting solid residue the storage or disposition of which is controlled by other agencies.

“Commercial hazardous waste management facility” means any facility engaged in the storage, treatment, recovery or disposal of hazardous waste for a fee and which accepts hazardous waste from more than one (1) generator. A facility (i) which is designed principally for treatment of aqueous hazardous wastes and residue; and (ii) which is situated within an industrial park or area; and (iii) which disposes of no hazardous waste within the State of Mississippi shall not constitute a commercial hazardous waste management facility for purposes of Section 17-17-151(3)(a) only.

“Commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility” means any facility engaged in the storage, treatment, processing or disposal of nonhazardous solid waste for compensation or which accepts nonhazardous solid waste from more than one (1) generator not owned by the facility owner.

“Commercial oil field exploration and production waste disposal” means storage, treatment, recovery, processing, disposal or acceptance of oil field exploration and production waste from more than one (1) generator or for a fee.

“Commercial purpose” means for the purpose of economic gain.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality.

“Composting or compost plant” means an officially controlled method or operation whereby putrescible solid wastes are broken down through microbic action to a material offering no hazard or nuisance factors to public health or well-being.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.

“Disposal” means the discharge, deposit, injection, dumping, spilling, leaking or placing of any solid waste or hazardous waste into or on any land or water so that such solid waste or hazardous waste or any constituent thereof may enter the environment or be emitted into the air or discharged into any waters, including groundwaters.

“Executive director” means the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.

“Garbage” means putrescible animal and vegetable wastes resulting from the handling, preparation, cooking and consumption of food, including wastes from markets, storage facilities, handling and sale of produce and other food products, and excepting such materials that may be serviced by garbage grinders and handled as household sewage.

“Hazardous wastes” means any waste or combination of waste of a solid, liquid, contained gaseous, or semisolid form which because of its quantity, concentration or physical, chemical or infectious characteristics, may (i) cause, or significantly contribute to an increase in mortality or an increase in serious irreversible or incapacitating reversible illness; or (ii) pose a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment when improperly treated, stored, transported, disposed of, or otherwise managed which are listed by the Environmental Protection Agency as hazardous wastes which exceed the threshold limits set forth in the Environmental Protection Agency regulations for classifying hazardous waste. Such wastes include, but are not limited to, those wastes which are toxic, corrosive, flammable, irritants, strong sensitizers, or which generate pressure through decomposition, heat or other means. Such wastes do not include those radioactive materials regulated pursuant to the Mississippi Radiation Protection Law of 1976, appearing in Section 45-14-1 et seq.

“Hazardous waste management” means the systematic control of the collection, source separation, storage, transportation, processing, treatment, recovery and disposal of hazardous waste.

“Head” means the head of the Office of Pollution Control of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality or his designee.

“Health department” means the Mississippi State Health Department and every county or district health department. “Health officer” means the state or affected county health officer or his designee.

“Manifest” means the form used for identifying the quantity, composition, origin, routing and destination of hazardous waste during its transport.

“Office” means the Office of Pollution Control of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.

“Open dump” means any officially recognized place, land or building which serves as a final depository for solid wastes, whether or not burned or buried, which does not meet the minimum requirements for a sanitary landfill, except approved incinerators, compost plants and salvage yards.

“Permit board” means the permit board created by Section 49-17-28.

“Person” means any individual, trust, firm, joint-stock company, public or private corporation (including a government corporation), partnership, association, state, or any agency or institution thereof, municipality, commission, political subdivision of a state or any interstate body, and includes any officer or governing or managing body of any municipality, political subdivision, or the United States or any officer or employee thereof.

“Pollution Emergency Fund” means the fund created under Section 49-17-68.

“Rubbish” means nonputrescible solid wastes (excluding ashes) consisting of both combustible and noncombustible wastes. Combustible rubbish includes paper, rags, cartons, wood, furniture, rubber, plastics, yard trimmings, leaves and similar materials. Noncombustible rubbish includes glass, crockery, metal cans, metal furniture and like materials which will not burn at ordinary incinerator temperatures (not less than 1600 degrees F).

“Sanitary landfill” means a controlled area of land upon which solid waste is deposited, and is compacted and covered with no on-site burning of wastes, and so located, contoured, drained and operated so that it will not cause an adverse effect on public health or the environment.

“Solid wastes” means any garbage, refuse, sludge from a waste treatment plant, water supply treatment plant or air pollution control facility and other discarded material, including solid, liquid, semisolid or contained gaseous material resulting from industrial, commercial, mining and agricultural operations, and from community activities, but does not include solid or dissolved material in domestic sewage, or solid or dissolved materials in irrigation return flows or industrial discharges which are point sources subject to permits under Section 402 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended (86 Stat. 880), or source, special nuclear or by-product material as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954.

“Storage” means the containment of wastes, either on a temporary basis or for a period of years, except as provided in 40 C.F.R. 263.12, in such a manner as not to constitute disposal of such wastes.

“Transport” means the movement of wastes from the point of generation to any intermediate points, and finally to the point of ultimate storage or disposal.

“Treatment” means any method, technique or process, including neutralization, designed to change the physical, chemical or biological character or composition of any solid waste in order to neutralize such character or composition of any solid waste, neutralize such waste or render such waste, safer for transport, amenable for recovery, amenable for storage or reduced in volume.

“Treatment facility” means a location at which waste is subjected to treatment and may include a facility where waste has been generated.

“Unauthorized dump” means any collection of solid wastes either dumped or caused to be dumped or placed on any property either public or private, whether or not regularly used. An abandoned automobile, large appliance, or similar large item of solid waste shall be considered as forming an unauthorized dump within the meaning of this chapter, but not the careless, scattered littering of smaller individual items as tires, bottles, cans and the like. An unauthorized dump shall also mean any solid waste disposal site which does not meet the regulatory provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 491, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 2; Laws, 1982, ch. 411, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 311, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 494 § 21; Laws, 1991, ch. 605 § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 543, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 17-17-5.
Local governing bodies to provide for collection and disposal of garbage and rubbish; contracts; regulation of sanitary landfills; annexation.

After December 31, 1992, the board of supervisors and/or municipal governing body shall provide for the collection and disposal of garbage and the disposal of rubbish. The board of supervisors and/or municipal governing body may provide such collection or disposal services by contract with private or other controlling agencies, and the service may include house-to-house service or the placement of regularly serviced and controlled bulk refuse receptacles within reasonable distance from the farthest affected household, and the wastes disposed of in a manner acceptable to the department and within the meaning of this chapter. The board of supervisors and/or municipal governing body may enter into contracts related in any manner to the collection and transportation of solid wastes for a term of up to six (6) years; however, for such contracts executed on or after July 1, 2019, the board of supervisors and/or municipal governing body may have the option to extend the contract by mutual consent of the parties in one-year increments up to four (4) additional years without advertising for proposals, as long as rate adjustments remain consistent with the existing contract and the total term of the contract does not exceed ten (10) years. The board of supervisors and/or municipal governing body may enter into contracts related in any manner to the generation and sale of energy generated from solid waste, and contracts for treatment, processing, distribution, recycling, elimination or disposal of solid wastes for a term of up to thirty (30) years. The municipal governing body of any municipality is authorized to regulate the disposal of garbage and rubbish in sanitary landfills, as provided in Section 21-19-1, Mississippi Code of 1972.

In the event an unincorporated area which is annexed by a municipality is being provided collection and disposal of garbage and rubbish under contract with private or other controlling agencies, the municipality shall annex the area subject to the contract for the remainder of the term of the contract, but not to exceed five (5) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 3(1); Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 3; Laws, 1982, ch. 405, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 523; Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 25; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 392, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000; Laws, 2019, ch. 360, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 17-17-7.
Garbage disposal.

Garbage and rubbish containing garbage shall be disposed of by sanitary landfill, approved incineration, composting, or by other means now available or which may later become available as approved by the department and under the supervision and control of a governmental, private or other agency acting within the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 3(2); Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-9.
Burning of garbage, etc.

No garbage, or rubbish containing garbage or other putrescible materials, or hazardous wastes shall be burned except in approved incinerators meeting the necessary temperature requirements and air pollution controls as now established or may later be established. The open burning of rubbish shall be permitted only under controlled circumstances where sanitary landfill and landfill is not feasible, and not in proximity to sanitary landfill or landfill operations where spread of fire to these operations may be a hazard in the opinion of the controlling agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 24, 1974).

§ 17-17-11.
Hauling of solid waste.

Trucks or other vehicles engaged in the business of hauling solid waste shall be so covered, secured or sealed that there will be no loss during haulage to cause littering of streets and highways or cause a nuisance or hazard to the public health.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 473, § 3; Laws, 1979, ch. 491, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 17-17-13.
Exemption.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent an individual or firm from disposing of solid waste from his own household or business upon his own land, provided such wastes are not hazardous as defined in Section 17-17-3(i) and provided such household or business is located and situated in the State of Mississippi

Provided, however, this exemption shall not operate to prevent the conduct of any waste disposal site investigation or inventory required by applicable state or federal law, rule or regulation, and further shall not operate to exclude from the regulatory provisions of this chapter any solid waste determined by the department to have characteristics that constitute an endangerment to the environment or the public health, safety or welfare, or any site used for the disposal of such solid waste.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 3; Laws, 1976, ch. 341, § 6; Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-15.
Disposal of hazardous wastes.

Hazardous wastes shall not be handled or disposed of along with or in the same site or adjoining site as ordinary wastes unless specifically approved as exempted waste by the department. These shall be disposed of by special incinerators, separate landfills, or other means dictated by the particularities of the hazardous waste involved, as determined by the department or other responsible agency. The department may, in its discretion, maintain a field office at any treatment or disposal facility that receives hazardous wastes directly or indirectly from more than one (1) generator. However, the department shall maintain a field office at any commercial off-site multiuser hazardous waste incinerator designed to incinerate multiple nonhomogeneous types of wastes, and the cost of operating such field office shall be borne by the owner of such commercial hazardous waste incinerator. The field office, when required, shall be located in adequate accommodations provided by the facility owner and shall be staffed with department regulatory personnel as deemed necessary by the department. In exercising its discretion to determine the need for a field office, regulatory staff and support equipment, the department shall consider, at a minimum, the type and amount of hazardous waste received and also the type of facility. All fees shall be established by the department and shall be in addition to any other fees provided by law. The fee prescribed by the department shall be in an amount not less than the actual operating expenses of the permanent field office and shall be in addition to any other fees required by law.

In addition to considering all applicable state and federal laws and regulations, the Mississippi Pollution Control Permit Board shall not issue a permit for the establishment or operation of a commercial hazardous waste landfill for the disposal of hazardous waste (as defined by Section 17-17-3, Mississippi Code of 1972), in the State of Mississippi until the Environmental Protection Agency makes a final determination, pursuant to the Federal Hazardous and Solid Waste Amendments of 1984, P.L. No. 98-616, that each waste to be placed in such landfill is suitable for land disposal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 4; Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 399; Laws, 1985, ch. 436; Laws, 1989, ch. 496, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 17-17-17.
Unauthorized dumps as public nuisance per se.

The formation of unauthorized dumps is hereby declared to be a public nuisance per se, menacing public health and unlawful, and any person who forms an unauthorized dump shall be punished as provided in Section 17-17-29. Existing dumps shall be eliminated by removal or on-site burial.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 24, 1974).

§ 17-17-19.
Vermin control.

Rodents and insects of public health importance, as rats, flies, mosquitoes and the like shall be controlled in a manner satisfactory to the health department; and the closing out or conversion to sanitary landfill operations of existing open dumps shall, where deemed necessary by the health officer, be accompanied by an adequate rat eradication program to prevent the spread of rodents to nearby properties.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 24, 1974).

§§ 17-17-21 through 17-17-25.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 581, § 32, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§17-17-21. [En Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 5]

§17-17-23. [En Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 5; Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 7; Laws, 1982, ch. 411, § 2]

§17-17-25. [En Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 5]

§ 17-17-27.
Enforcement of chapter; adoption of rules and regulations; revocation of permit; variances; renewals or extensions; public availability of information; application of Trade Secrets Act.

The department shall exercise such supervision over restrictions, equipment, methodology and personnel in the management of solid wastes as may be necessary to enforce sanitary requirements; and the commission shall adopt such rules and regulations as may be needed to specify methodology and procedures to meet the requirements of this chapter, which shall include at a minimum:

Criteria for the determination of whether any waste or combination of wastes is hazardous for the purposes of this chapter;

Rules and regulations for the storage, treatment and disposal of solid wastes;

Rules and regulations for the transportation, containerization and labeling of hazardous wastes, which rules shall be consistent with those issued by the United States Department of Transportation;

Rules and regulations specifying the terms and conditions under which the permit board shall issue, modify, suspend, revoke or deny such permits as may be required by this chapter. Such rules and regulations shall include, and not by way of limitation, specific authority for the permit board to consider the financial capability and performance history of an applicant;

Rules and regulations establishing standards and procedures for the safe storage or transportation of hazardous waste and for the safe operation and maintenance of hazardous waste treatment or disposal facilities or sites or equipment;

A listing of those wastes or combinations of wastes which are not compatible, and which may not be stored or disposed of together;

Procedures and requirements for the use of a manifest during the transport of hazardous wastes;

Standards for financial responsibility to cover the liability, closure and post-closure of any site and perpetual care of a commercial hazardous waste landfill. Rules and regulations promulgated hereunder may include, and not by way of limitation, requirements for maintaining liability insurance coverage if such coverage is not required under rules and regulations promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency;

Rules and regulations establishing minimum distances within which any hazardous waste disposal facility may be located from any municipality, school, residence, church or health care facility;

Other rules and regulations as the commission deems necessary to manage hazardous wastes in the state, provided that such rules and regulations shall be equivalent to the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s rules and regulations.

In complying with this section the commission shall consider the variations within this state in climate, geology, population density and such other factors as may be relevant to the management of hazardous wastes. It is the intent of the Legislature that commercial hazardous waste landfills be located on those sites which, by virtue of their geologic conditions, provide a high degree of environmental protection. In carrying out the intent of this provision, the commission is authorized to adopt siting criteria for commercial hazardous waste landfills which are more stringent or extensive in scope, coverage and effect than the rules and regulations promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

Except as hereinafter provided, hazardous wastes shall not be disposed of in this state by the use of underground injection methods, as herein defined according to 40 CFR 260.10(74) to mean “subsurface emplacement of fluids through a bored, drilled, or driven well, or through a dug well, where the depth of the dug well is greater than the largest surface dimension.” This prohibition shall not apply to the disposal on the generation site of hazardous wastes generated in the production of oil or gas or in a commercial or manufacturing operation. Commercial hazardous waste underground injection wells designed or intended to dispose of multiple nonhomogeneous types of wastes from multiple sources other than the owner of the well are hereby prohibited in the State of Mississippi.

A commercial hazardous waste landfill shall not be located on the same site or within one thousand (1,000) feet of an existing or abandoned ordinary waste disposal site, unless the hazardous waste to be disposed of in said commercial landfill is specifically approved as exempted.

After promulgation of the regulations required under this section, no person shall construct, substantially alter or operate any solid waste treatment or disposal facility or site, nor shall any person store, treat or dispose of any hazardous waste without first obtaining a permit from the permit board for such facility, site or activity. However, no person shall construct any new hazardous waste treatment or disposal facility or site or substantially alter any such existing facility or site, nor shall the permit board issue a permit for any such construction or alteration, until the commission has promulgated rules and regulations under the provisions of subsection (1)(j) of this section. Said rules and regulations shall be equivalent to counterpart rules and regulations of the Environmental Protection Agency whether now in effect or hereinafter promulgated. Any person who has made an application for a permit for an existing facility under this section shall be treated as having been issued such permit until such time as final administrative disposition of such application has been made unless the cause of such delay is the result of the failure of the applicant to furnish information reasonably required or requested in order to process the application.

Any permit issued under this section may be revoked by the issuing agency at any time when the permittee fails to comply with the terms and conditions of the permit. Where the obtaining of or compliance with any permit required under this section would, in the judgment of the department, cause undue or unreasonable hardship to any person, the department may issue a variance from these requirements. In no case shall the duration of any such variance exceed one (1) year. Renewals or extensions may be given only after an opportunity has been given for public comment on each such renewal or extension.

Information obtained by the commission concerning environmental protection including but not limited to information contained in applications for solid or hazardous waste disposal permits shall be public information and shall be made available upon proper request. Other information obtained by the commission, department, or permit board in the administration of Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47 concerning trade secrets, including, but not limited to, marketing or financial information, treatment, transportation, storage or disposal processes or devices, methods of manufacture, or production capabilities or amounts shall be kept confidential if and only if: (a) a written confidentiality claim is made when the information is supplied; (b) such confidentiality claim allows disclosure to authorized department employees and/or the United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA); and (c) such confidentiality claim is determined by the commission to be valid. If the confidentiality claim is denied, the information sought to be covered thereby shall not be released or disclosed, except to the Environmental Protection Agency, until the claimant has been notified in writing and afforded an opportunity for a hearing and appeal therefrom, as with other orders of the commission. Disclosure of confidential information by the EPA shall be governed by federal law and EPA regulations. Misappropriation of a trade secret shall be governed by the Mississippi Uniform Trade Secrets Act, Sections 75-26-1 through 75-26-19.

Anyone making unauthorized disclosure of information determined to be confidential as herein provided shall be liable in a civil action for damages arising therefrom and shall also be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by law.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the executive director, upon receipt of information that the generation, storage, transportation, treatment or disposal of any solid waste may present an imminent and substantial hazard to the public health or to the environment, may take any legal, equitable or other action, including injunctive relief, necessary to protect the health of such persons or the environment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 6; Laws, 1979, ch. 491, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 551, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 8; Laws, 1982, ch. 490, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 332, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 442, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 17-17-29.
Penalties; injunction; recovery of cost of remedial action; disposition of fines.

Any person found by the commission violating any of the provisions of Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47, or any rule or regulation or written order of the commission in pursuance thereof, or any condition or limitation of a permit, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for each violation, such penalty to be assessed and levied by the commission after a hearing. Appeals from the imposition of the civil penalty may be taken to the chancery court in the same manner as appeals from orders of the commission. If the appellant desires to stay the execution of a civil penalty assessed by the commission, he shall give bond with sufficient resident sureties of one or more guaranty or surety companies authorized to do business in this state, payable to the State of Mississippi, in an amount equal to double the amount of any civil penalty assessed by the commission, as to which the stay of execution is desired, conditioned, if the judgment shall be affirmed, to pay all costs of the assessment entered against the appellant. Each day upon which such violation occurs shall be deemed a separate and additional violation.

In lieu of, or in addition to, the penalty provided in subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall have the power to institute and maintain in the name of the state any and all proceedings necessary or appropriate to enforce the provisions of Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47, rules and regulations in force pursuant thereto, and orders and permits made and issued under those sections, in the appropriate circuit, chancery, county or justice court of the county in which venue may lie. The commission may obtain mandatory or prohibitory injunctive relief, either temporary or permanent, and in cases of imminent and substantial hazard as set forth in Section 17-17-27, it shall not be necessary in such cases that the state plead or prove (a) that irreparable damage would result if the injunction did not issue; (b) that there is no adequate remedy at law; or (c) that a written complaint or commission order has first been issued for the alleged violation.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of, or fails to perform any duty imposed by, Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47, or any rule or regulation issued hereunder, or who violates any order or determination of the commission promulgated pursuant to such sections, and causes the death of wildlife shall be liable, in addition to the penalties provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, to pay to the state an additional amount equal to the sum of money reasonably necessary to replenish such wildlife as determined by the commission after consultation with the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. Such amount may be recovered by the commission on behalf of the state in a civil action brought in the appropriate county or circuit court of the county in which venue may lie.

Any person creating, or responsible for creating, through misadventure, happenstance, or otherwise, an immediate necessity for remedial or clean-up action involving solid waste shall be liable for the cost of such remedial or clean-up action and the commission may recover the cost of same by a civil action brought in the circuit court of the county in which venue may lie. This penalty may be recovered in lieu of or in addition to the penalties provided in subsections (1), (2) and (3) of this section.

In the event of the necessity for immediate remedial or clean-up action, the commission may contract for same and advance funds from the Pollution Emergency Fund to pay the costs thereof, such advancements to be repaid to the Pollution Emergency Fund upon recovery by the commission as provided herein.

Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter or violates any order issued by the commission under the authority of this chapter shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of not more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for each day of violation or to imprisonment not to exceed one (1) year, or both. Each day’s violation shall constitute a separate offense.

All fines, penalties and other sums recovered or collected by the commission for and in behalf of the state under this section shall be deposited in the Pollution Emergency Fund established by Sections 49-17-61 through 49-17-70, and the commission is authorized to receive and accept, from any and all available sources whatsoever, additional funds to be deposited in such fund and expended for the purpose of remedial, cleanup or abatement actions involving the introduction of solid waste upon or into the land, air or waters of this state in violation of Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47, any rule or regulation or written order of the commission in pursuance thereof, or any condition or limitation of a permit.

In determining the amount of any penalty under this chapter, the commission shall consider at a minimum:

The willfulness of the violation;

Any damage to air, water, land or other natural resources of the state or their uses;

Costs of restoration and abatement;

Economic benefit as a result of noncompliance;

The seriousness of the violation, including any harm to the environment and any hazard to the health, safety and welfare of the public;

Past performance history; and

Whether the noncompliance was discovered and reported as the result of a voluntary self-evaluation. If a person discovers as a result of a voluntary self-evaluation, information related to noncompliance with an environmental law and voluntarily discloses that information to the department, commission or any employee thereof, the commission shall, to the greatest extent possible, reduce a penalty, if any, determined by the commission, except for economic benefit as a result of noncompliance, to a de minimis amount if all of the following are true:

The disclosure is made promptly after knowledge of the information disclosed is obtained by the person;

The person making the disclosure initiates the appropriate corrective actions and pursues those corrective actions with due diligence;

The person making the disclosure cooperates with the commission and the department regarding investigation of the issues identified in the disclosure;

The person is not otherwise required by an environmental law to make the disclosure to the commission or the department;

The information was not obtained through any source independent of the voluntary self-evaluation or by the department through observation, sampling or monitoring;

The noncompliance did not result in a substantial endangerment threatening the public health, safety or welfare or the environment; and

The noncompliance is not a repeat violation occurring at the same facility within a period of three (3) years. “Repeat violation” in this subparagraph means a second or subsequent violation, after the first violation has ceased, of the same statutory provision, regulation, permit condition, or condition in an order of the commission.

Any provision of this section and chapter regarding liability for the costs of cleanup, removal, remediation or abatement of any pollution, hazardous waste or solid waste shall be limited as provided in Section 49-17-42 and rules adopted thereto.

Any person who violates Section 49-17-603, shall, in addition to any other penalties, be subject to the penalties provided in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 7; Laws, 1979, ch. 491, § 6; Laws, 1980, ch. 551, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 9; Laws, 1988, ch. 311, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 334, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 627, § 5; Laws, 2001, ch. 560, § 3; Laws, 2003, ch. 301, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Jan. 20, 2003.).

§ 17-17-31.
Provisions supplemental.

The provisions of this chapter are supplemental and in addition to Section 21-19-1 and Sections 19-5-17 through 19-5-27, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 573, § 8; Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 17-17-33.
Participation in regional solid waste disposal, recycling, and recovery systems authorized.

Counties, municipal and private companies are hereby authorized to participate in applicable approved regional solid waste disposal, recycling and recovery systems.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 341, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 587, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 17-17-35.
Entry and inspection of generating, treating, storage, transportation and disposal equipment, facilities, etc.

Authorized employees or representatives of the department shall be authorized to enter and inspect generating, treating, storage, transportation and disposal equipment, facilities or sites to determine proper treatment, storage, transportation and/or disposal. Employees and/or representatives of the department shall be authorized to enter and inspect at any time vehicles transporting or disposing of wastes as outlined in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 341, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 10; Laws, 1991, ch. 494 § 23, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1991).

§ 17-17-37.
Property rights in solid wastes.

The solid wastes involved shall become the lawful property of the local governments and/or commercial enterprises involved at the point of collection and in the absence of contractual provisions to the contrary, shall become the property of the operator of an approved system upon delivery to such operator whether delivery be at a transfer station or at a processing plant.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 341, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1976).

§ 17-17-39.
Construction or operation of authorized solid waste disposal systems or facilities not impaired.

Nothing in Sections 17-17-33 through 17-17-41 shall be construed to prohibit local governments from the construction or operation of approved sanitary landfills, or of any other heretofore or hereafter approved solid waste disposal system, it being the intent of Sections 17-17-33 through 17-17-41 that their provisions shall be supplementary to, and not restrictive of, any previously authorized solid waste disposal system, facility or operation, nor of any other such system, facility or operation which may be authorized in the future.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 341, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1976).

§ 17-17-41.
Construction or operation of recycling plants or sale or gift of solid wastes not prohibited.

Nothing in Sections 17-17-33 through 17-17-41 shall be construed to prohibit private enterprise or other agencies from the construction or operation of recycling plants or to prohibit the sale or gift of solid wastes to private enterprise or other agencies by local governments.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 341, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1976).

§ 17-17-43.
Procedures applicable to hearings before commission and permit board.

The procedures whereby the commission or an employee thereof may obtain a hearing before the commission on a violation of any provision of Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-41 and Section 17-17-47 or of a regulation or of any order of the commission or whereby any interested person may obtain a hearing on matters within the jurisdiction of the commission or a hearing on any order of the commission shall be as prescribed in Sections 49-17-31 through 49-17-41.

Further, all proceedings before the permit board of the bureau of pollution and control shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by Section 49-17-29.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 411, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1982).

§ 17-17-45.
Appeal to chancery court.

In addition to any other remedies that might now be available, any person or interested party aggrieved by an order of the commission or of the permit board of the bureau of pollution control shall have the right to perfect an appeal to the appropriate chancery court in the manner set forth in Sections 49-17-41 and 49-17-29.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 411, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1982).